Washington statutes.
RCW 43.22.430

RCW 43.22.340 and 43.22.350 through 43.22.420 not to apply to common carrier equipment.

RCW 43.22.340 and 43.22.350 through 43.22.420 shall not apply to common carrier equipment.

[ 1970 ex.s. c 27 s 10.]